Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-1402] School of nursing and dental
hygiene; functions. The school of nursing and dental hygiene shall conduct
a complete course in nursing leading to the conferring of an appropriate
bachelor's degree upon graduation therefrom and sufficient to qualify its
graduates as registered nurses. The curriculum of the school of nursing and
dental hygiene shall be such as the board of regents may approve and may
include subjects outside of the field of nursing as may be deemed consonant
with the requirements of a university education and clinical training and
practice in hospitals and similar institutions. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next